src/fst/root.lexd
PATTERNS
Intransitive_Verbs

Statives

Transitive_Verbs

Ruuk

Independent_Pronouns

Uninflected_Determiners

Possessive_Determiners

Gendered_Articles

Noun_Possession

Complete_Pronouns

Complete_Conjunctions

Complete_Particles

Complete_Toponyms

Complete_Prepositions

Complete_Interrogatives

Complete_Adverbs

Complete_Proper_Nouns

Numbers
